Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2224
Board; personnel, facilities, and equipment.

In order to administer and enforce the Real Property Appraiser Act, the board may hire a director and other staff, rent office space, and acquire other facilities and equipment. The board may contract for administrative assistance, including facilities, equipment, supplies, and personnel that are required by the board to carry out its responsibilities under the act.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 24;

Laws 1991, LB 203, § 25;

Laws 1994, LB 1107, § 20;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 44.